Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.160.030

Authorizing individual transportation or other arrangements.

Individual transportation, board and room, and other arrangements may be authorized or provided and, in whole or part, paid for or reimbursed by a school district, when approved by the educational service district superintendent or his or her designee pursuant to rules promulgated by the superintendent of public instruction for that purpose: PROVIDED, That the total of payments for board and room and transportation incidental thereto shall not exceed the amount which would otherwise be paid for such individual transportation.

[ 1981 c 265 s 11; 1977 c 80 s 2; 1971 ex.s. c 66 s 10; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.24.100. Prior: 1965 ex.s. c 154 s 9. Formerly RCW 28A.24.100, 28.24.100.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Severability—1981 c 265: See notes following RCW 28A.160.150.

Severability—1977 c 80: "If any provision of this 1977 amendatory act, or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the act, or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances is not affected." [ 1977 c 80 s 5.]

Severability—Effective date—1971 ex.s. c 66: See notes following RCW 28A.155.010.